District of Columbia statutes.
26-1401.04

Issuance of certificate of authority.

If the Commissioner approves the application of a financial institution to become certified as a universal bank, the Commissioner shall issue to the financial institution a certificate of authority stating that the financial institution is certified as a universal bank under this chapter.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 204, 48 DCR 3244

History